Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-608] Reemployed teachers; rights.
After the completion of the probationary period without discharge, such
teachers as are thereupon reemployed shall continue in service in the public
schools during good behavior and competent service and prior to the age at
which the teachers are eligible for retirement, pursuant to section 88-73 or
88-281, and shall not be discharged or demoted except for one or more of the
causes specified in section 302A-609. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next